Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
DEPOSITS

§431:7-301 Deposits of insurers. (a)
The director of finance shall accept, when made through the commissioner,
deposits of securities or funds by insurers as follows:

(1) Deposits in amount as required to be made as
prerequisite to a certificate of authority to transact insurance in this State.

(2) Deposits of insurers in amount as required to be
made by the laws of other states as prerequisites for authority to transact
insurance in such other states.

(3) Deposits in other additional amounts permitted to
be made by this part.

(b) This part shall apply to the deposits
listed in this section unless expressly inconsistent with the provisions of
article 3 of this code, in which case the provisions of article 3 shall
prevail. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1989, c 207, §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next